Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2202
Insurance company; variable annuities; requirements.

Before a company may apply to issue variable annuities in this state, it must have an initial amount of capital and surplus, if a stock company, or an amount of surplus, if a mutual company, of at least two million dollars and shall maintain a surplus, if either a stock company or a mutual company, of at least one million five hundred thousand dollars. The Director of Insurance may make exceptions to this provision if he or she deems it in the public interest to do so. In addition to meeting the requirements of this section, a foreign company must be licensed to do a variable annuity or life insurance business in its state of domicile before it may apply to issue variable annuities in this state.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 2, p. 1260;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 64.